Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 5

Public Employee Defined Benefit Financial Security Act of 2014

9-3-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Employee Defined Benefit Financial Security Act of 2014.”

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3.

9-3-502. Applicability of part.

This part shall apply to political subdivisions that provide defined benefit plans not administered by the Tennessee consolidated retirement system.

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3.

9-3-503. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Actuarially determined contribution” (ADC), formerly known as the “actuarially required contribution” means the actuarially determined annual required contribution that incorporates both the normal cost of benefits and the amortization of the pension plan's unfunded accrued liability;

“Pension plan” means the defined benefit pension plan established and maintained by a political subdivision for its employees, excluding a political subdivision's participation in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system pursuant to title 8, chapters 34–37. The term “pension plan” shall include all pension plans that are open or closed to membership, and shall also include the plural, referring to any and all pension plans provided by a political subdivision;

“Political subdivision” means any local governmental entity, including, but not limited to any municipality, metropolitan government, county, utility district, school district, public building authority, housing authority, emergency communications district, and development district created and existing pursuant to the laws of this state, or any instrumentality of government created by any one (1) or more of the named local governmental entities;

“Political subdivision employee” means any person in the employ of a political subdivision who participates in the political subdivision's pension plan;

“Unfunded accrued liability” means the actuarially determined accrued liabilities of the pension plan that are greater than the actuarially determined value of the pension plan assets.

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3.

9-3-504. Political subdivisions to develop funding policies.

Notwithstanding any law, rule, ordinance, resolution, charter, pension plan, agreement or pension plan contract to the contrary, the applicable provisions of this part shall apply to any political subdivision in the state that has established and maintains, directly or indirectly, a defined benefit pension plan for the benefits of its employees, irrespective of the manner in which the pension plan is administered.

Each political subdivision shall develop a funding policy for financing the obligations under the pension plan. Such funding policy shall be legally adopted and approved through a resolution by the political subdivision's chief legislative body or governing body. The funding policy shall be in effect until amended. Each political subdivision shall develop a funding policy for fiscal years beginning after June 15, 2015. The funding policy and any amendment thereto shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury within thirty (30) days after adoption.

The political subdivision's funding policy shall include, but not be limited to the following:

The ADC for each pension plan shall include the normal costs and the amortization of the unfunded accrued liability, to the extent that any of the plans have any unfunded accrued liability for a particular fiscal year;

The maximum amortization period for which any unfunded accrued liabilities will be paid; and

A statement that the political subdivision's budget shall include funding of at least one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC, except as provided in § 9-3-505(b).

The actuarial methodology is expected to provide that projected revenues (employer contributions, employee contributions, and investment earnings), and current assets will finance all of the projected benefits (death, disability, and retirement) provided by the plan. In the event that pension plan has an unfunded accrued liability, the level dollar amortization method shall be utilized beginning on or before June 15, 2020, for financing the unfunded accrued liability, and will continue to be utilized thereafter.

The ADC calculated by the political subdivision's actuary shall be calculated utilizing the following methodology, and in accordance with the Actuarial Standards of Practice established by the Actuarial Standards Board:

Actuarial cost method allocating normal costs over a period beginning no earlier than the date of employment which should not exceed the last assumed retirement age. This method is designed to fully fund the long-term costs of promised benefits, consistent with the objective of keeping contributions relatively stable and equitably allocating the costs over the employees' period of active service. Commencing with the plan fiscal year beginning after June 15, 2019, a generally accepted actuarial method that achieves the above objectives shall be used, except the projected unit credit method is not permitted;

Actuarial value of assets calculated using a maximum ten-year asset smoothing period. Any smoothing period greater than five (5) years will have a maximum twenty percent (20%) market corridor. For the purposes of this subsection (e), the term “market corridor” means a range beyond which deviations are not smoothed;

No later than the plan fiscal year beginning after June 15, 2020, the level dollar amortization method of unfunded accrued liabilities;

Mortality assumptions, which should consider the effect of expected mortality improvements, and shall be utilized beginning on or before the plan fiscal year after June 15, 2024, and will continue to be utilized thereafter;

Investment earnings assumption that shall not be greater than fifty (50) basis points above the rate adopted by the Tennessee consolidated retirement system; and

A closed amortization period not to exceed thirty (30) years for all unfunded accrued liabilities.

The ADC for the political subdivision's pension plan shall be determined by an independent, qualified actuary.

The actuary used by the political subdivision shall be a member of the American Academy of Actuaries.

The actuary used by a political subdivision for the calculation of the ADC for its pension plan shall not be an employee of that political subdivision, and shall not be otherwise eligible to participate in any of the political subdivision's pension plans.

The measurement standard used to determine a pension plan's funded status must be done in accordance with rules, standards, guidelines, and interpretations established by the governmental accounting standards board.

The actuary's determinations, including the ADC, shall be contained in a report submitted to the political subdivision and shall include a certification indicating the actuary's report has been prepared in accordance with all of the Actuarial Standards of Practice established by the Actuarial Standards Board as well as an explanation for any deviations. The actuary shall also certify in the report the overall appropriateness of the analysis in addition to the assumptions and results. The assumptions analyzed by the actuary must include, but not be limited to, the following: asset experience, including, but not limited to, the investment rate of return, discount rate, salary experience, cost of living adjustments, rates of retirement, turnover, and disability; mortality, including future improvement; and forms of benefit payments, including, but not limited to, lump sum payments.

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3; 2018, ch. 681, § 1; 2020, ch. 783, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (j).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 783, § 4. July 15, 2020.

9-3-505. Payments by political subdivision to pension plan — Annual funding progress percentage — Plan of correction.

A political subdivision shall annually pay a payment to the pension plan of no less than one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC; however, it may make a payment of more than one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC.

A political subdivision that is not paying at least one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC to its pension plan for the fiscal year that includes June 30, 2015, shall maintain effort in the percentage of the ADC paid and, in addition thereto, in each subsequent year, pay the cumulative annual funding progress percentage to increase the funding percentage of the ADC to the pension plan until payment of one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC occurs within a maximum of five (5) consecutive years after June 30, 2015. The annual funding progress percentage is, as a minimum, the percentage determined by dividing by five (5) the difference between the percentage of the ADC paid in the plan fiscal year preceding July 1, 2015, subtracted from one hundred percent (100%). When payment of one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC occurs, the political subdivision shall continue to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC annually. The ADC shall be recalculated each year and the percentage of funding shall be based on the most recent recalculation of the ADC.

If a political subdivision is unable to meet the annual funding progress percentage set out in subsection (b), the political subdivision may submit a plan of correction to the state treasurer for consideration. If the state treasurer determines the plan of correction is sufficient to comply with the requirements of subsection (b) as soon as possible and to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC to the pension plan by June 30, 2020, the state treasurer shall submit the plan of correction to the state funding board for approval. The plan of correction shall contain, at a minimum, the following: the reason for the political subdivision's inability to meet the annual funding progress percentage of subsection (b); the political subdivision's detailed plan to comply with the requirements of subsection (b) as soon as possible and to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the ADC to the pension plan no later than June 30, 2020, including, but not limited to the amount or amounts to be paid by a date certain or over a period of time; reports necessary to demonstrate how the political subdivision will comply with the plan of corrective action; and any amendment to the political subdivision's funding policy to comply with the plan of corrective action. In addition to the information provided in the political subdivision's plan of corrective action, the political subdivision shall promptly furnish any additional documentation the state treasurer may request, including, but not limited to, financial data and actuarial reports.

A political subdivision that does not pay one hundred percent (100%) of its ADC in any fiscal year beginning with July 1, 2020, shall pay the difference between funding equal to one hundred percent (100%) of its ADC and what was actually paid by the political subdivision in a particular fiscal year by adding the difference or differences to the one-hundred-percent payment of the political subdivision's ADC, which must be paid in the fiscal year subsequent to the underpaid ADC. The difference or differences may be added cumulatively to the political subdivision's one-hundred-percent payment of its ADC.

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3; 2020, ch. 783, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 783, § 4. July 15, 2020.

9-3-506. Provisions applicable to political subdivision's administration of pension plan benefits.

The following shall apply to all political subdivisions subject to this part:

For political subdivision employees hired on or after May 22, 2014, the political subdivision may freeze, suspend or modify benefits, employee contributions, plan terms and design on a prospective basis;

Subdivision (a)(1)(A) does not affect any judicial precedents or statutory law as they apply to employees who were employed prior to May 22, 2014;

For any pension plan that is funded below sixty percent (60%), the political subdivision shall not establish a benefit enhancement until it has received written approval by the state treasurer. For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(2), “benefit enhancement” means any change in member benefits, benefit structure, or benefit formula provided by a political subdivision relative to its pension plan that, according to the political subdivision's actuary, will or is estimated to permanently, temporarily, or intermittently increase either the employer or employee contributions or the liabilities of the pension plan; and

For political subdivisions with an existing pension plan as of May 22, 2014, the political subdivision shall not establish a new pension plan that changes the funding policy, increases the employer cost, or adds to the unfunded accrued liability of an existing pension plan until it has received written approval from the state treasurer. For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(3), a political subdivision establishes a new pension plan by taking any or a combination of the following actions:

Establishing a tier that has not been previously provided as part of a pension plan;

Reopening a previously closed pension plan or previously closed tier of a pension plan; or

Establishing a plan that is different from the political subdivision's existing pension plan.

The accrued benefits earned prior to any adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) shall remain an enforceable right and may not be reduced without the written consent of the political subdivision employee, unless the employee is subject to the forfeiture of the employee's retirement benefits in accordance with § 8-35-124.

Notwithstanding any other law, for political subdivision employees hired on or after May 22, 2014, nothing under state law confers to participants in the pension plan an implied right to future retirement benefit arrangements, and such participants may not assert the indefinite continuation of the retirement formulas, contribution rates, eligibility ages, or any other provision of the pension plan.

Subdivision (c)(1) does not affect any judicial precedents or statutory law as they apply to employees who were employed prior to May 22, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3; 2018, ch. 681, § 2; 2020, ch. 783, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (a)(2) and (a)(3) which read: “(2) For any pension plan that is funded below sixty percent (60%), the political subdivision shall not establish benefits enhancements unless approved by the state treasurer; and (3) For political subdivisions with an existing pension plan as of May 22, 2014, the political subdivision shall not establish a new pension plan until it has received written approval from the state treasurer.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 783, § 4. July 15, 2020.

9-3-507. Withholding of money from state-shared taxes to be paid to political subdivision's pension plan in event of failure to pay established percentages.

In the event the political subdivision shall fail to fund the ADC according to the percentages established in § 9-3-505, the commissioner of finance and administration, at the direction of the comptroller of the treasury, is authorized to withhold such amount or part of such amount from any state-shared taxes that are otherwise apportioned to such political subdivision. The money withheld from state-shared taxes shall be paid to the political subdivision's pension plan.

The deduction shall be made as a first charge against any moneys payable to such political subdivision regardless of the source of such payment and regardless of the purpose or contemplated use of such funds.

Regardless of a political subdivision's funding level of its ADC, a political subdivision may, with the recommendation of the state treasurer and the approval of the board of trustees of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system:

Continue the administration of its pension plan, but have the pension plan funds co-invested with the pension plan assets for the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, but established in a separate fund from the Tennessee consolidated retirement system assets, and accounted for separately with accurate and detailed accounting records. The separate fund shall be operated in accordance with IRS Revenue Ruling 2011-1 or subsequent guidance regarding a group trust fund under Internal Revenue Code § 401(a)(24) (26 U.S.C. § 401(a)(24)). Before a political subdivision's pension plan assets are co-invested with Tennessee consolidated retirement system assets, the political subdivision shall provide the department of treasury with its plan document and a determination letter from the internal revenue service that its plan assets are qualified assets or written advice from competent counsel of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system that the plan is a qualified plan. The political subdivision shall enter into an agreement with the retirement system for the co-investment of the political subdivision's pension plan assets, which shall include a charge assessed by the retirement system against the political subdivision for services related to the co-investment of assets; or

Continue the pension plan, but have the plan administered by the Tennessee consolidated retirement system and have the assets co-invested with the Tennessee consolidated retirement system pension plan assets;

The political subdivision shall enter into an agreement with the Tennessee consolidated retirement system to provide billing services, participant enrollment services, participant accounts, data processing, recordkeeping, investment and other related services that are necessary or appropriate to the administration of the political subdivision's pension plan. The agreement may provide that the services be provided directly by staff of the retirement system or through contracts with other providers;

Any agreement entered into under this section shall require that the political subdivision remain the responsible administrator for the political subdivision's pension plan, and that neither the state of Tennessee nor the retirement system, or any of its officers, agents, employees, or boards shall act as a trustee or be considered the trustee for the political subdivision's pension plan;

The chair of the retirement system shall assess a charge to the political subdivision for the administration of the political subdivision's pension plan and co-investment of its assets, in an amount to be determined by the chair, to meet the administrative expenses of the retirement system in providing the administration and co-investment services under this section. It is the legislative intent that the state shall realize no increased cost as a result of the administration of the political subdivision's pension plan and co-investment of its assets, and that all costs associated with the administration of the pension plan, including administrative and co-investment costs, shall be the responsibility of the respective political subdivision. In the event that the political subdivision refuses or otherwise fails to satisfy this liability, such amounts shall become a lien on the property of the political subdivision and may be withheld from state-shared taxes which are otherwise apportioned to the political subdivision;

As a condition of providing the services described in this section for the administration of a political subdivision's pension plan, and at any time thereafter, the chair of the retirement system may require that the political subdivision provide proof that the political subdivision's pension plan is a qualified plan and otherwise complies with the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The chair of the retirement system may require an opinion of counsel or other assurance satisfactory to the chair that the provision of the services described in this section does not cause the retirement system, the state, or any of their agencies or employees to violate any federal or state laws or regulations;

Political subdivisions shall take all actions that the retirement system, in its discretion, deems necessary for compliance by the retirement system with all applicable federal and state laws or for qualification of the retirement system for any exemptions from regulation available under those laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Securities Act of 1933, as amended, (15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.), and the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, (15 U.S.C. § 80(a)-1 et seq.);

The political subdivision's plan shall be administered separately from the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, and shall be administered according to the political subdivision's pension plan documents;

The political subdivision's plan assets shall be established in a separate fund from the Tennessee consolidated retirement system assets, and accounted for separately with accurate and detailed accounting records. The separate fund shall be operated in accordance with IRS Revenue Ruling 2011-1 or subsequent guidance regarding a group trust fund under Internal Revenue Code § 401(a)(24). Before a political subdivision's pension plan assets are co-invested with Tennessee consolidated retirement system assets, the political subdivision shall provide the department of treasury with its plan document and a determination letter from the internal revenue service that its plan assets are qualified assets.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, through its administration of a political subdivision's pension plan, or the co-investment of the political subdivision's pension plan assets, as set forth in subdivisions (c)(1) and (2), the Tennessee consolidated retirement system shall not be liable for the payment of any retirement allowances or other benefits on account for the political subdivision employees or their respective beneficiaries, for which reserves have not been previously created from funds contributed by the political subdivision or the political subdivision employees for such benefits.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the extent that some or all of a political subdivision's pension plan assets intended to be invested pursuant to subsection (c) do not comport with the investment policy for the Tennessee consolidated retirement system:

The board of trustees for the Tennessee consolidated retirement system may permit, as a written exception or amendment to the investment policy, the co-investment of the pension plan assets with the pension plan assets for the Tennessee consolidated retirement system under subsection (c). Such an exception or amendment shall contain the limitations, conditions, or restrictions on the co-investment of pension plan assets, including, but not limited to, the management strategy and timeframe for the conversion or liquidation of the pension plan assets to an investment authorized by the retirement system's investment policy within a reasonable period of time, considering the market for such investments. An exception or amendment under this subsection (e) may address multiple pension plans, a single pension plan, or be general in nature; or

The state treasurer may take custody of the pension plan assets in an account separate from the Tennessee consolidated retirement system assets. The state treasurer shall invest the pension plan assets in accordance with the political subdivision's investment policy. The political subdivision's agreement for services provided under this section shall provide:

The limitations, conditions, or restrictions on the investment of pension plan assets, including, but not limited to, the management strategy and timeframe for the conversion or liquidation of the pension plan assets to an investment authorized by the retirement system's investment policy within a reasonable period of time, considering the market for such investments; and

A charge assessed to the political subdivision for such services.

Nothing in this subsection (e) shall prohibit a portion of a political subdivision's assets from being co-invested while a portion of the political subdivision's assets are invested separately under this subsection (e).

Acts 2014, ch. 990, § 3; 2018, ch. 833, § 1.